Hawaii statutes.
§621-26 Confessions when admissible.
No confession shall be received in evidence unless it is first made to appear
to the judge before whom the case is being tried that the confession was in
fact voluntarily made. [L 1876, c 32, §64; RL 1925, §2630; am L 1927, c 204,
§1; am L 1929, c 62, §1; RL 1935, §3834; RL 1945, §9846; RL 1955, §222-26; HRS
§621-26; am L 1972, c 104, §1(s)]

Case Notes

Voluntary confession, made without inducement of fear or
hope, is entitled to much weight. 1 H. 81.

Error to reject evidence of inducement by person whom accused
might regard as having authority. 3 H. 313.

Previous statement in writing, admissibility. 3 H. 166,
questioned on other grounds. 9 H. 548, 549.

Admission induced by promise of being "clear" held
admissible. 10 H. 94.

See 3 H. 30; 3 H. 237; 16 H. 267; 21 H. 214; 38 H. 609.

Cross-examination. 29 H. 441; 34 F.2d 86. Intoxication. 32
H. 528. By silence. 34 H. 167. Written. 36 H. 1; 36 H. 231; 37 H. 189; 38
H. 245; 39 H. 221; 188 F.2d 54.

Comment by court on voluntary nature of admission. 30 H.
697; 42 H. 367.

Detention, violation of "48-hour" law, failure to
take promptly before magistrate. 43 H. 347; 45 H. 622, 372 P.2d 365; 48 H.
204, 397 P.2d 558.

Court's ruling on admissibility was not in error. 44 H. 71,
351 P.2d 1097. Ruling conclusive if supported by more than a mere scintilla of
evidence. 44 H. 352, 354 P.2d 986; 44 H. 403, 354 P.2d 960; 47 H. 158, 385
P.2d 830. Finding of admissibility not disturbed without showing of clear
abuse of discretion. 51 H. 260, 457 P.2d 505.

Voluntary confession is admissible when confession and
independent evidence together establish corpus delicti. 44 H. 352, 354 P.2d
986; 45 H. 269, 367 P.2d 81.

Effect of unlawful search and seizure on confession. 45 H.
622, 372 P.2d 365; 48 H. 204, 397 P.2d 558.

Effect of voluntariness: Mental instability, amnesia. 44 H.
403, 354 P.2d 960.

Scope of preliminary examination on voluntariness where there
are several co-defendants. 46 H. 183, 377 P.2d 728.

Statute applies only to confession of defendant on trial, not
to confession of co-defendant. 53 H. 574, 499 P.2d 678.

No error in admitting statement where there is more than a
scintilla of evidence supporting trial court's ruling that statement was
voluntarily made. 58 H. 323, 568 P.2d 1200.

Effect on voluntariness: use of drugs. 59 H. 565, 583 P.2d
347.

Medical testimony on the effects of LSD was relevant to the
issue of voluntariness of confession. 59 H. 565, 583 P.2d 347.

Voluntariness hearing is also a constitutional right. 61 H.
198, 600 P.2d 1142.

Where in granting defendant's motion to suppress evidence,
circuit court concluded that coercive conduct of a private person, i.e., a
coach, was sufficient to render defendant's confession inadmissible under this
section, supreme court affirmed addressing constitutional issues. 77 H. 51,
881 P.2d 538 (1994).

The language of §641-13(7), which allows the prosecution to
appeal from "a pretrial order granting a motion for the suppression of
evidence", includes within its scope the right to appeal from a trial
court's voluntariness determination mandated by this section. 104 H. 224, 87
P.3d 893 (2004).

Trial judge has duty to determine admissibility of
inculpatory statement prior to jury's exposure to such evidence. 1 H. App.
221, 617 P.2d 98.

Cited: 39 H. 141, 145.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next